Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1722
Sheriff's office merit commission; created; county having 25,000 inhabitants or more.

In any county having a population of twenty-five thousand inhabitants or more, there shall be a sheriff's office merit commission.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 2, p. 642;

Laws 1972, LB 1093, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 315, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 122, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 782, § 2.